Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 65 Guardians Generally
28-65-308. Power to borrow money, make gifts, etc.

Upon a showing that the action would be advantageous to the ward and his or her estate, the court may authorize the guardian to borrow money, to execute notes and other legal evidences of indebtedness, and to mortgage property of the ward in accordance with the provisions of §28-65-314.

Upon a showing that the action would be advantageous to the ward and his or her estate, the court may authorize the guardian to make gifts and disclaimers on behalf of the ward.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 31; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-850.

28-65-309. Periodic allowances.

The guardian of the estate, or any person, department, bureau, agency, or charitable organization having the care and custody of a ward may apply to the court for an order directing the guardian of the estate to pay to the person, department, bureau, agency, or charitable organization having the care and custody of the ward or, if the guardian of the estate has the care and custody of the ward, directing the guardian of the estate to apply a designated amount periodically as the court may direct, to be extended for the care, maintenance, and education of the ward and of his or her dependents.

In proper cases the court may order payment of amounts directly to the ward for his or her maintenance or incidental expenses.

The amounts authorized under this section may be decreased or increased from time to time by direction of the court.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 33; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-852.

28-65-310. Support of minor ward.

The support of their unmarried minor children is chargeable jointly and severally upon the property of the husband and the property of the wife, and in the relation thereto, they may be sued either jointly or severally.

Although the responsibility for the care, maintenance, and education of a minor rests upon his or her parents or persons in loco parentis, if there are such persons, nevertheless in appropriate cases and taking into consideration the relative resources and circumstances of a parent and the minor ward, the court, in its discretion, may authorize the guardian of the estate to expend income or principal of the ward's estate for the ward's care, maintenance, and education.

(1)As far as necessary for the purpose, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the income of the ward's estate shall be first applied to his or her care, maintenance, and education.

On order of the court, any surplus of the income may be applied to the care, maintenance, and education of the dependents of the ward.

If the income is not sufficient to care for, maintain, and educate the ward and his or her dependents, the court may order the expenditure of such portion of the principal as it from time to time finds necessary for such purposes.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 34; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-853.

28-65-311. Investments.

The guardian of the estate may, and when ordered by the court shall, deposit as a fiduciary, the funds of the ward in a financial institution of this state, as a general deposit, either in a checking account or a savings account.

The guardian shall invest the funds of the ward not reasonably needed for the ward's care, maintenance, or education in securities selected by the guardian from among the following categories:

(1)Without prior order of the court, no investment shall be made, other than an investment in:

Subdivision (c)(1)(H)(i)(c)(1) of this section does not expand the field of membership of a credit union.

The court shall not approve an investment in an issue of securities which has been in default for a period exceeding one hundred twenty (120) days during the five (5) years next preceding the investment.

Participation in the common trust fund which, by the terms of the instrument creating it, limits the purchase of investments for such funds to investments authorized in this chapter;

Shares, securities, or other interests of any open-end or closed-end management-type investment company or investment trust registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2015; or

An exchange-traded fund listed on a national securities exchange, the portfolio of which is limited to the securities authorized in this chapter.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 35; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-854; Acts 1989, No. 658, §§ 1, 2; 1991, No. 347, § 1; 1997, No. 331, § 1; 2015, No. 1129, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 591, § 1.

28-65-312. Retention of property and investment.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 36; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-855.

28-65-313. Purchase of home.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 37; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-856.

28-65-314. Sales, mortgages, etc., of property generally.

Participation by a guardian in behalf of his or her ward in the execution and delivery of one (1) or more deeds, bills of sale, assignments, or other appropriate instruments to accomplish the partition in kind between the owners thereof, of real or personal property in which the ward owns an undivided interest, for the purposes of this section shall be deemed an exchange of property of the ward.

(A)This requirement shall not be applicable when a special guardian is appointed to represent the interest of the ward and the special guardian reports to the court after the property has been appraised that the proposed purchase at a private sale is in the best interest of the ward.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 40; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-859; Acts 1991, No. 1068, § 1.

28-65-315. Oil, gas, and mineral interests — Sale, lease, etc.

After notice given to these persons, if any, as the court may direct, the court shall hear the petition and shall require a showing of the facts required for determination whether the lease, assignment, sale, conveyance, or contract was for the best interest of the ward under the circumstances existing at the time it was made.

Prior to making the order, the court shall ascertain whether the guardian's bond is sufficient in amount and security to protect the estate of the ward with respect to the proceeds of the transaction involved. If the bond is not sufficient, the court shall require, as a prerequisite to making the order, that the guardian's bond be increased or supplemented in amount or security to adequately protect the ward's estate, including the proceeds of the transaction reviewed. The supplemental bond may be filed with and approved by the court making the order.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 41; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-860; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 182.

28-65-316. Oil, gas, and mineral interests — Agreements for operation and development.

Upon petition of the guardian of the estate and after notice to such persons, if any, as the court may direct, the court may authorize the guardian of the estate of an incapacitated person in behalf of his or her ward to enter into transactions and to execute all instruments necessary or advantageous to the ward's estate in the operation and development of any interest, including leasehold interest, which the ward may own in oil, gas, or minerals, including, but not limited to, unit operating agreements, royalty unitization agreements, royalty pooling agreements, field unitization and repressure agreements, and such other agreements and contracts relative thereto as the court shall find to be for the best interest of the ward.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 32; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-851.

28-65-317. Payment of claims.

A guardian of the estate is under a duty to pay from the estate all just claims against the estate of his or her ward, whether they constitute liabilities of the ward which arose prior to the guardianship or liabilities properly incurred by the guardian for the benefit of the ward or his or her estate and whether arising in contract or in tort or otherwise, upon allowance of the claim by the court or upon approval by the court in a settlement of the guardian's accounts.

The duty of the guardian to pay from the estate shall not preclude his or her personal liability for his or her own contracts and acts made and performed in behalf of the estate as it exists according to the common law.

Upon the petition of any person having a claim against the estate of a ward for services lawfully rendered to the ward or his or her estate for necessaries furnished to the ward, or for the payment of a lawful liquidated claim or demand against the estate of the ward, the court, after notice, upon appropriate hearing, may direct the guardian to pay the claim.

Claimants had a right to file their claims against the estate of an insane person in the probate court and, having elected to do so, that court had jurisdiction to hear and allow the claims. First State Bank & Trust Co. v. Thessing, 241 Ark. 150, 406 S.W.2d 865 (1966) (decision under prior law).

The probate court has exclusive jurisdiction over the payment of claims against a ward's account; therefore, the circuit court was in error in ordering payment. While appellee acted properly in filing and establishing its foreign judgment in circuit court, it then was required to file its claim in the probate court to receive payment. Forehand v. American Collection Serv., Inc., 307 Ark. 342, 819 S.W.2d 282 (1991).

Sections 28-65-107(a) and this section bring into focus the settled rule that probate court is a court of special and limited jurisdiction, having only such jurisdiction and powers as are conferred by the constitution or by statute, or necessarily incidental thereto. Arkansas State Employees Ins. Advisory Comm. v. Estate of Manning, 316 Ark. 143, 870 S.W.2d 748 (1994).

The probate court had no subject matter jurisdiction to rule on an insurer's subrogation claim. Arkansas State Employees Ins. Advisory Comm. v. Estate of Manning, 316 Ark. 143, 870 S.W.2d 748 (1994).

A discharge, acquittance, or receipt given by a guardian of the estate for any claim other than one arising out of tort shall be valid in favor of any person who takes it in good faith, but the guardian shall assume the burden of establishing that any compromise not previously approved by the court was made in the interest of the ward and his or her estate and shall be liable to his or her ward if he or she or his or her estate is injured thereby.

A guardian could compromise claims for personal property if done in good faith. Nashville Lumber Co. v. Barefield, 93 Ark. 353, 124 S.W. 758 (1910) (decision under prior law).

A probate court was without the power to enforce a compromise of ward's claim against an insurance company. Union Cent. Life Ins. Co. v. Boggs, 188 Ark. 604, 66 S.W.2d 1077 (1934) (decision under prior law).

Probate courts are courts of limited and specific jurisdiction, and they have only the powers conferred by the Constitution or by statute or powers necessarily incidental to those specifically granted. Arkansas Dep't of Human Servs. v. Estate of Hogan, 314 Ark. 19, 858 S.W.2d 105 (1993).

A coguardian of an incompetent ward could retain counsel without court authorization, and such counsel was entitled to reasonable attorney fees set by the probate court for services rendered for the estate of the ward despite the other coguardian's objection that the counsel was representing the coguardian personally where the objecting coguardian had a conflict of interest with the estate of the ward. Jones v. Barnett, 236 Ark. 117, 365 S.W.2d 241 (1963) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Arkansas State Employees Ins. Advisory Comm. v. Estate of Manning, 316 Ark. 143, 870 S.W.2d 748 (1994).

A guardian is authorized to employ legal counsel in connection with the discharge of his duties, and the hiring of an attorney is not among those decisions made by a guardian that always requires prior court approval. Johnson v. Guardianship of Ratcliff, 72 Ark. App. 85, 34 S.W.3d 749 (2000).

This section authorizes allowance of fees in favor of a guardian required to defend his actions as guardian and his accounting. The trial court is permitted to take into consideration any failures on the part of the guardian in the allowance of fees. Winters v. Winters, 24 Ark. App. 29, 747 S.W.2d 583 (1988).

Trial court abused it's discretion in disallowing all fees and costs incurred during specific dates where the trial court gave no explanation for lowering the attorney's hourly fee, nor did the court explain why it cut off fees incurred prior to a certain date; such decisive but unreasoned action clearly constituted an abuse of discretion. Bailey v. Rahe, 355 Ark. 560, 142 S.W.3d 634 (2004).

In an estate action, the appellate court was unable to discern whether attorney fees were based on the total market value of the real and personal property reportable to the circuit court or whether they was based on some other measure and certificates of deposit had been inexplicably cashed and placed in a trust and then listed as assets; thus, for purposes of determining attorney fees, which were based in part on the size of the estate, a remand for reconsideration was required to determine which assets were properly estate assets. Monk v. Griffin, 92 Ark. App. 320, 213 S.W.3d 651 (2005).

Annually within sixty (60) days after the anniversary date of his or her appointment; and

Within sixty (60) days after termination of his or her guardianship.

When notice has been given as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the settlement by the court of an account is binding upon all persons concerned, subject to the right of appeal and to the power of the courts to vacate its final order.

The provisions of §§ 28-52-101, 28-52-103 — 28-52-105, 28-52-107, 28-52-108, and 28-52-110 relating to accounting by a personal representative shall apply also to accounting by a guardian.

A guardian who fails to file an accounting within the time limit prescribed by this section may be denied compensation for services performed between the date an accounting should have been filed and the date it is filed.

Cross References. Attachment to compel accounting, §28-52-103.

Though a guardian's power could be revoked by the death or marriage of his ward, a probate court still had the authority to make him account. Price v. Peterson, 38 Ark. 494 (1882); Ruble v. Cottrell, 57 Ark. 190, 21 S.W. 33 (1893) (decisions under prior law).

Trial court lacked the authority to compel appellant to file an accounting of appellant's time as guardian of the parties'mother's estate in Pennsylvania because while the statute did not specifically state that a court could only order an accounting from an Arkansas guardian, case law made it plain that an Arkansas court was prohibited from ordering an accounting from a former foreign guardian.Hetman v. Schwade, 2009 Ark. 302, 317 S.W.3d 559 (2009).

Compromise of a claim enforceable in a circuit or chancery court was not binding when approved only by an order of a probate court prior to the settlement of the guardian's accounts. Moss v. Moose, 184 Ark. 798, 44 S.W.2d 825 (1931); Union Cent. Life Ins. Co. v. Boggs, 188 Ark. 604, 66 S.W.2d 1077 (1934) (decisions under prior law).

If a guardian, at the time of furnishing food, clothing, and other items of support, did not intend to charge the ward, he could not subsequently take credit for such items in his settlement. Reynolds v. Jones, 63 Ark. 259, 38 S.W. 151 (1896) (decision under prior law).

Where a ward lived with the guardian as a member of the family and rendered ordinary household services required by parents of their children, such services would be presumed, in absence of clear proof to the contrary, to be sufficient compensation for the ward's support. Campbell v. Clark, 63 Ark. 450, 39 S.W. 262 (1897) (decision under prior law).

Exceptions to accounts were held not triable by jury. Crow v. Reed, 38 Ark. 482 (1882) (decision under prior law).

An executor, as such, could not be required to settle his accounts as executor in a proceeding against him as guardian of an heir to the estate of which he was executor. Dale v. Dale, 134 Ark. 61, 203 S.W. 258 (1918) (decision under prior law).

The settlements of a guardian could be attacked only in chancery for fraud. Phelps v. Buck, 40 Ark. 219 (1882); Haden v. Swepston, 64 Ark. 477, 43 S.W. 393 (1897) (decisions under prior law).

The surety of a guardian's bond was not released from liability thereon until the guardian had filed a final report as required in former similar statute, notice of a hearing thereon had been given, the hearing held, and the report approved by the court in full compliance with former similar statute. Nabors v. Quick, 245 Ark. 560, 433 S.W.2d 844 (1968) (decision under prior law).

Where the guardian of an incompetent veteran made proper distribution of the ward's funds after the ward's death, including the payment of bills and obligations incurred in the lifetime of the ward, and the distribution of the estate to the heirs, the guardian's account would not be reopened on motion of an administrator to require the guardian to pay money to the administrator which after payment to the administrator would be distributed in the same manner as it was by guardian, except as to fees which the administrator would receive. Hicks v. Johnson, 196 Ark. 103, 116 S.W.2d 597 (1938) (decision under prior law).

Upon appeal from an order of a probate court confirming the amount of a guardian of an insane person, the court would review the various items of the account whether exceptions were saved to them in the probate court or not. Nelson v. Cowling, 89 Ark. 334, 116 S.W. 890 (1909) (decision under prior law).

A guardian had to file separate accounts for each ward. Crow v. Reed, 38 Ark. 482 (1882) (decision under prior law).

The statute of limitations did not begin to run in favor of a guardian until his discharge. Connelly v. Weatherford, 33 Ark. 658 (1878) (decision under prior law).

Cross References. Assessment of property, §26-26-904.

Inventory of estate of decedent, §28-49-110.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 38; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-857.

28-65-318. Compromise settlements.

On petition of the guardian of the estate, the court, if satisfied that the action would be in the interest of the ward and his or her estate, may make an order authorizing the settlement or compromise of any claim by or against the ward or his or her estate, whether arising out of contract, tort, or otherwise, and whether arising before or after the appointment of the guardian.

(1)A settlement of a tort claim against a ward made by or in behalf of the guardian of the estate shall be binding, if otherwise valid, without authorization or approval by the court.

However, a guardian shall not take credit in his or her accounts for any money or property expended by him or her in the settlement unless the guardian has first been authorized by the court to make the settlement or unless the guardian, after having made the settlement, establishes to the satisfaction of the court by clear and convincing evidence that the settlement was in the interest of the ward and his or her estate.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 39; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-858.

28-65-319. Employment of professionals.

(1)The guardian may employ legal counsel in connection with the discharge of his or her duties, and the court shall fix the attorney's fee, which shall be allowed as an item of the expense of administration.

If the guardian is an attorney and has performed necessary legal services in connection with the guardianship, the court shall take into consideration the nature and extent of such services in fixing the compensation of the guardian.

The guardian, when authorized by the court, may employ accountants, engineers, appraisers, brokers, and other persons whose services are reasonably required in the discharge of his or her duties, and the court shall fix the compensation for such services, which shall be allowed as an item of expense of the administration.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 42; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-861.

28-65-320. Accounting.

Unless otherwise directed by the court, a guardian of the estate shall file with the court a written verified account of his or her administration:

Notice of the hearing of every accounting shall be given to the same persons and in the same manner as is required by §§28-65-207 and28-65-208 for notice of the petition for the appointment of a guardian, except that the court may dispense with the giving of notice to a mentally incompetent ward upon a satisfactory showing that the giving of notice would be detrimental to his or her well-being.

With respect to each item for which credit is claimed, the account shall show whether or not the item has been paid, and, in either event, the court may allow or disallow any item in whole or in part, subject to such protection as is extended the guardian with respect to actions taken by him or her in good faith in reliance upon orders previously made by the court.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 43; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-862.

28-65-321. Inventory — Appraisement.

The guardian of the estate shall file an inventory of the ward's property in the same manner and subject to the same requirements as are provided in §28-49-110 for the inventory of a decedent's estate.

In its discretion, the court may order the appraisement of the ward's property by one (1) or more disinterested and qualified persons appointed by the court.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 24; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-843.

28-65-322. Reports.

All guardians shall file an annual report with the court. The report shall contain:

The person's current mental, physical, and social conditions;

His or her present living arrangements;

The need for continued guardianship services;

An accounting of his or her estate if the guardian has been delegated that responsibility by the court order or as a result of being a guardian of the estate; and

Any other information requested by the court or necessary in the opinion of the guardian.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 25; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-844.